Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-811.01
Judicial nominating commission; nominations; number; considerations.

Any judicial nominating commission which has for its consideration three or more candidates for a judicial vacancy shall nominate at least three candidates for consideration by the Governor if the commission, in its discretion, finds them to be sufficiently qualified. In determining whether a candidate is sufficiently qualified to be nominated for a judicial vacancy, a judicial nominating commission shall consider the candidate's knowledge of the law, experience in the legal system, intellect, capacity for fairness, probity, temperament, industry, and such other factors relating to judicial quality as the Supreme Court may by rule promulgate.

Laws 1973, LB 110, § 9;

Laws 1980, LB 730, § 3.